Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202637-201
Game Law, how cited.

Sections 37-201 to 37-814 and 37-1501 to 37-1510 and the State Park System Construction Alternatives Act shall be known and may be cited as the Game Law.

Laws 1929, c. 112, I, § 2, p. 408;

C.S.1929, § 37-102;

R.S.1943, § 37-102;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 251, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 403, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 830, § 7;

Laws 1994, LB 1088, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 1165, § 6;

Laws 1995, LB 274, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 923, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 19, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1997, § 37-102;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 11;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 2;

Laws 2000, LB 788, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 14;

Laws 2003, LB 305, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 826, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 121, § 2;

Laws 2005, LB 162, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB504, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB105, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB743, § 3;

Laws 2010, LB836, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB391, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB928, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB699, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB814, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB142, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB474, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB775, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB374, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB287, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB507, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB1082, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB867, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB1335, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB979, § 1.
July 18, 2026
State Park System Construction Alternatives Act, see section 37-1701.